Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.200

Minority and women's business enterprises account—Created.

The minority and women's business enterprises account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from RCW 39.19.210, 39.19.220, and 39.19.230 and civil penalties imposed under RCW 39.19.090 shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes defraying all or part of the costs of the office in administering this chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

[ 2021 c 160 s 6; 1993 c 195 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date of 1993 c 195—1993 sp.s. c 24: "Chapter 195, Laws of 1993 is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 930.]